Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Subarticle B. Consolidation

§ 17-16-1110.
Consolidation.

Any two (2) or more domestic corporations may consolidate into a new corporation pursuant to a plan of consolidation approved in the manner provided in this act.

The board of directors of each corporation shall, by a resolution adopted by each board, approve a plan of consolidation setting forth:

The names of the corporations proposing to consolidate, and the name of the new corporation into which they proposed to consolidate, which is hereinafter designated as the new corporation;

The terms and conditions of the proposed consolidation;

The manner and basis of converting the shares of each corporation into shares or other securities or obligations of the new corporation or of any other corporation or, in whole or in part, into cash or other property;

With respect to the new corporation, all of the statements required to be set forth in articles of incorporation for corporations organized under this act; and

Such other provisions with respect to the proposed consolidation as are deemed necessary or desirable.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§ 17-16-1111.
Approval by shareholders; abandonment of plan.

The board of directors of each corporation, upon approving the plan of consolidation, shall, by resolution, direct that the plan be submitted to a vote at a meeting of shareholders, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written or printed notice shall be given to each shareholder of record whether or not entitled to vote at the meeting, not less than twenty (20) days before the meeting, in the manner provided in this act for the giving of notice of meetings of shareholders, and shall state that the purpose or one (1) of the purposes of the meeting is to consider the proposed plan of consolidation, whether the meeting be an annual or a special meeting. A copy of a summary of the plan of consolidation shall be included in or enclosed with the notice.

At the shareholder’s meeting for each corporation, a vote of the shareholders shall be taken on the proposed plan. The plan shall be approved upon receiving the affirmative vote of the holders of at least a majority of the shares entitled to vote. However, if any class of shares of each corporation is entitled to vote as a class, the plan shall be approved upon receiving the affirmative vote of the holders of at least a majority of the shares of each class of shares entitled to vote as a class. Any class of shares of each corporation shall be entitled to vote as a class if the plan contains any provision which, if contained in a proposed amendment to articles of incorporation, would entitle the class of shares to vote as a class.

After approval by a vote of the shareholders of each corporation, and at any time prior to the filing of the articles of consolidation, the consolidation may be abandoned pursuant to provisions of the articles of consolidation, if any, set forth in the plan.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to action without meeting, see §

17-16-704

.

As to notice of shareholders' meetings, see §

17-16-705

.

As to waiver of notice, see §

17-16-706

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Corporate Disloyalty — A Wyoming Case and the ALI Project,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 111 (1986).

§ 17-16-1112.
Articles of consolidation.

Upon approval, articles of consolidation shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing. The articles of consolidation shall set forth:

The plan of consolidation;

As to each corporation the shareholders of which were required to vote on the plan, the number of shares outstanding, and, if the shares of any class are entitled to vote as a class, the designation and number of outstanding shares of each class;

As to each corporation the shareholders of which were required to vote on the plan, the number of shares voted for and against the plan, respectively, and, if the shares of any class are entitled to vote as a class, the number of shares of each class voted for and against the plan respectively.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-16-1113.
Effect of consolidation.

A consolidation becomes effective upon filing by the secretary of state, or on a later date, not more than thirty (30) days subsequent to filing the plan with the secretary of state, as shall be provided in the plan.

When a consolidation takes effect:

The several corporations party to the plan of consolidation are a single corporation, which is the new corporation provided for in the plan of consolidation;

The separate existence of all corporations party to the plan of consolidation except the new corporation ceases;

The new corporation has all the rights, privileges, immunities and powers and is subject to all the duties and liabilities of a corporation organized under this act;

The new corporation has all the rights, privileges, immunities and franchises, public or private, of each corporation party to the plan of consolidation. The title to all real estate and other property owned by each corporation party to the plan of consolidation is vested in the new corporation without reversion or impairment;

The new corporation has all the liabilities and obligations of each corporation party to the plan of consolidation. Any claim existing or proceeding pending by or against any corporation party to the plan of consolidation may be continued as if the consolidation did not occur or the new corporation may be substituted for the corporation whose existence ceased. Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens upon the property of any corporation party to the plan of consolidation shall be impaired by the consolidation;

The statements set forth in the articles of consolidation and which are required or permitted to be set forth in the articles of incorporation of corporations organized under this act shall be deemed to be the original articles of incorporation of the new corporation;

The shares of each corporation party to the plan of consolidation that are to be converted into shares, obligations or other securities of the new corporation or into cash or other property are converted, and the former holders of the shares are entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of consolidation or to their rights under article 13 of this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§ 17-16-1114.
Consolidation of domestic and foreign corporations.

One (1) or more foreign corporations and one (1) or more domestic corporations may be consolidated in the following manner, if the consolidation is permitted by the laws of the state under which each foreign corporation is organized:

Each domestic corporation shall comply with the provisions of this act with respect to the consolidation of domestic corporations and each foreign corporation shall comply with the applicable provisions of the laws of the state under which it is organized;

If the new corporation in a consolidation is to be governed by the laws of any state other than Wyoming, it shall comply with the provisions of this act with respect to foreign corporations if it is to transact business in Wyoming, and in every case it shall file with the secretary of state of Wyoming:

An agreement that it may be served with process in Wyoming in any proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation of any domestic corporation which is a party to such consolidation and in any proceeding for the enforcement of the rights of a dissenting shareholder of any such domestic corporation against the new corporation;

An irrevocable appointment of the secretary of state of Wyoming as its agent to accept service of process in any such proceeding; and

An agreement that it will promptly pay to the dissenting shareholders of any such domestic corporation the amount, if any, to which they shall be entitled under the provisions of this act with respect to the rights of dissenting shareholders.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to dissenters' rights, see article 13 of this chapter.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.